Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202569-2011
Disposable diapers; requirements; Director of Water, Energy, and Environment; duties.

On and after October 1, 1993, a person shall not sell or offer for sale at retail any disposable diaper which is constructed of a material which is not biodegradable or photodegradable if the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment determines that biodegradable or photodegradable disposable diapers are readily available at a comparable price and quality. The determination of quality shall include a study of the environmental impact and fate of such disposable diapers. The director shall issue his or her determination to the Legislature on or before October 1, 1992. For purposes of this section (1) readily available shall mean available for purchase in sufficient quantities to meet demand through usual retail channels throughout the state and (2) comparable price and quality shall mean at a cost not in excess of five percent above the average price for products of comparable quality which are not biodegradable or photodegradable.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 42;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 84;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 371.